test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-saakk_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - saakk â-stem: # Noun 'message' 1.1.1.1.1.1.2.1.3 - full paradigm
# 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 167)
# 1.1 Sg.Loc in -âst. â-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
# 1.1.1 Sg.Ill in ʹ-e
# 1.1.1.1 Has Gradation
# 1.1.1.1.1 Monophthong
# 1.1.1.1.1.1 Homogenous Consonant
# 1.1.1.1.1.1.2 Sg.Nom Strong Grade
# 1.1.1.1.1.1.2.1.Sg.Gen Weak Grade
# 1.1.1.1.1.1.2.1.3 Sg.Ill Extra Strong Grade

     saakk+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: saakk
     saakk+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: saaǥǥ
     saakk+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: saaǥǥ
     saakk+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: saʹǩǩe
     saakk+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: saaǥǥâst
     saakk+N+Sg+Com+Indef: saaǥǥin
     saakk+N+Ess+Indef: saakkân
     saakk+N+Par+Indef: saakkâd
     saakk+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [saaǥǥtaa, saaǥǥtää]
     saakk+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: saaǥǥ
     saakk+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: saaǥǥi
     saakk+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: saaǥǥid
     saakk+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: saaǥǥid
     saakk+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: saaǥǥin
     saakk+N+Pl+Com+Indef: saaǥǥivuiʹm
     saakk+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [saaǥǥitaa, saaǥǥitää]
     saakk+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: saaǥǥâž
